Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.005

Finding, intent.

The state of Washington finds that to realize the state's current statutory policy of regulating health professions at the least restrictive level consistent with the public interest, a program of licensure for denturists should be established. The intent of the legislature is to help assure the public's health, provide a mechanism for consumer protection, and offer cost-effective alternatives for denture care services and products to individual consumers and the state.

[ 1995 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]